Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.900

Severability—1957 c 253.

If any part, or parts, of this chapter shall be held unconstitutional, the remaining provisions shall be given full force and effect, as completely as if the part held unconstitutional had not been included herein, if any such remaining part can then be administered for the purpose of establishing and maintaining standards for assisted living facilities.

[ 2012 c 10 s 34; 1957 c 253 s 20.]

NOTES:

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.